Massachusetts, session 194th, H3712.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 11B of chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 71 and 72, the words “either a lamp
emitting a red light, or” and inserting in place thereof the following words: “a lamp emitting a
red light and.”
SECTION 2: Section 11B of chapter 85 of the General Laws is also hereby amended by
inserting a new subsection between subsection (9) and subsection (10), which will read: “No
retailer, distributor, wholesaler, or manufacturer in this state shall sell or offer for sale any
bicycle unless such bicycle is equipped with lamps and reflectors as required by Subsection (8)
and (9) of this Section.”

of 2

SECTION 3: Subsection (11) of section 11B of chapter 85 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 110 the
following words: “twenty dollars” and inserting the following words: “fifty dollars.”
of 2